Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. In General

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Uninsured Motorist Act: A Regulatory Reconciliation of Mandated Coverages with the Standard Uninsured Motorist Endorsement,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 213 (1976).

§ 31-9-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Act”.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 40; C.S. 1945, § 60-1540; W.S. 1957, § 31-277; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 4.

“Driver” means as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a);

“Division” means the division within the department of transportation charged with administration and enforcement of this act;

“Judgment” means any judgment that is final without further appeal. The judgment shall have been rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States. The cause of action shall result from damages occurring from a motor vehicle accident and may relate to bodily injury or death of person, or to damage or to loss of property;

“License” means any driver’s license, instruction permit or temporary license issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the licensing of drivers;

“Motor vehicle” means as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a);

“Nonresident” means every person who is not a resident of this state;

“Nonresident’s operating privilege” means the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation by him of a motor vehicle, or the use of a motor vehicle owned by him, in this state;

“Operator” means every person who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle;

“Owner” means as defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a);

“Proof of financial responsibility” means evidence of ability to respond in damages for liability, resulting from accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of the proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle, in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident, and subject to the limit for one (1) person, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident, and in the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident;

“Registration” means registration certificate or certificates and registration plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of motor vehicles;

“State” means any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia or any province of the Dominion of Canada;

“This act” means W.S.

31-9-101

through

31-9-415

.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 60-1501; Laws 1957, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, § 31-278; Laws 1961, ch. 165, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, §§ 3, 4; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to registration of motor vehicles, see §

31-2-201

et seq.

As to driver's licenses, see chapter 7 of this title.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied

in

Allstate Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 672 P.2d 810,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1983); Farmers Ins. Exch. v. Williams, 823 F. Supp. 927, 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21353 (D. Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Tavegia v. Bromley, 67 Wyo. 93, 214 P.2d 975,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1950); Ramsour v. Grange Ins. Ass'n, 541 P.2d 35,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1975); Ulrich v. United Servs. Auto. Ass'n, 839 P.2d 942,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1992); Pribble v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 933 P.2d 1108,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes ownership of automobile within meaning of automobile insurance owner's policy, 36 ALR4th 7.

Construction and application of statute imposing liability expressly upon motor vehicle lessor for damage caused by operation of vehicle, 41 ALR4th 993.

What constitutes use of automobile “to carry persons or property for fee” within exclusion of automobile insurance policy, 57 ALR5th 591.

§ 31-9-103.
Administration; administrative review.

The administration of this act shall be exercised by the department of transportation which may prescribe forms and reasonable rules and regulations in conformity with this act. The administration of this act may be delegated by the department to the division.

W.S.

31-7-105

and

31-7-130

apply to all suspensions under this act.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 60-1502; Laws 1957, ch. 231, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 31-279; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 173, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Superintendent (now division) may grant a hearing, in his discretion,

if and when a need therefor has been shown. Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Suspension of license and registration reviewable on merits.—

The district court has jurisdiction to review on the merits the action of the superintendent (now division) in suspending a driver's license, registration certificate and license plates on the ground that the driver has been involved in an accident and has failed to furnish proof of financial responsibility, where the driver in his petition alleges facts showing that he was not at fault in the accident and that the driver of the other vehicle involved had stated that he did not want damages and had promised to sign a release. Tavegia v. Bromley, 67 Wyo. 93, 214 P.2d 975,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1950).

Determination not binding on other driver not party to proceedings.—

A review on the merits by a district court is proper in connection with the superintendent's (now division's) action in suspending a license. However, a determination in such a review that the superintendent's (now division's) action was unauthorized is not binding on the driver of the other automobile involved in the collision, where he is not a party to the review proceedings. Wyoming Dep't of Revenue v. Wilson, 401 P.2d 960,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1965).

Cited

in

Diefenderfer v. Budd, 563 P.2d 1355,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1977); Ulrich v. United Servs. Auto. Ass'n, 839 P.2d 942,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 31-9-104.
Disclosure of driving record.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations concerning disclosure of the driving record of any person subject to this act.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 60-1503; W.S. 1957, § 31-280; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-105.
Return of license and registration to division.

Any person whose license or registration is suspended under this act, or whose policy of insurance or bond, when required under this act, is cancelled or terminated, or who neglects to furnish other proof upon request of the division shall immediately return his license and registration to the division. If any person fails to return to the division the license or registration as required, the division shall direct any peace officer to confiscate and return the license or registration to the division.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 31; C.S. 1945, § 60-1531; W.S. 1957, § 31-281; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in the first sentence, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-106.
General penalties.

Any person willfully failing to return a license or registration as required in W.S.

31-9-105

shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

Any person who forges or, without authority, signs any notice provided for under W.S.

31-9-202

that a policy or bond is in effect, or any evidence of proof of financial responsibility, or who files or offers for filing any notice or evidence of proof knowing or having reason to believe that it is forged or signed without authority, shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any person who violates any provision of this act for which no penalty is otherwise provided shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 32; C.S. 1945, § 60-1532; W.S. 1957, § 31-283; Laws 1959, ch. 75, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-9-107

; Laws 1985, ch. 107, § 2; ch. 234, § 2; 2020 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) deleted “imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both” at the end and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Chapter penal in nature and strictly construed. —

As a result of this section, this chapter is a penal statute. The rule of strict construction therefore applies. Tavegia v. Bromley, 67 Wyo. 93, 214 P.2d 975,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1950).

§ 31-9-107.
Government motor vehicles.

This act does not apply with respect to any motor vehicle owned by the United States, this state or any political subdivision of this state.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 33; C.S. 1945, § 60-1533; Laws 1955, ch. 13, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-284; W.S. 1977, §

31-9-108

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-108.
Other lawful processes.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as preventing the plaintiff in any action at law from relying for relief upon the other processes provided by law.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 37; C.S. 1945, § 60-1537; W.S. 1957, § 31-286; W.S. 1977, §

31-9-110

; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Suspension of license and registration reviewable on merits.—

The district court has jurisdiction to review on the merits the action of the superintendent (now division) in suspending a driver's license, registration certificate and license plates on the ground that the driver has been involved in an accident and has failed to furnish proof of financial responsibility, where the driver in his petition alleges facts showing that he was not at fault in the accident, and that the driver of the other vehicle involved had stated that he did not want damages and had promised to sign a release. Tavegia v. Bromley, 67 Wyo. 93, 214 P.2d 975,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1950).

§ 31-9-109.
Uniformity of laws.

This act shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 38; C.S. 1945, § 60-1538; W.S. 1957, § 31-287; W.S. 1977, § 31-9-111; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

Severability. —

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 39, provides: “If any part or parts of this act shall be held unconstitutional, such unconstitutionality shall not effect [affect] the validity of the remaining parts of this act. The legislature hereby declares that it would have passed the remaining parts of this act if it had known that such part or parts thereof would be declared unconstitutional.”

§ 31-9-110.
Providing proof of financial responsibility.

For purposes of this act, a person shall be considered to have provided and filed proof of financial responsibility whenever a search of the online insurance verification system or other verification system provides proof of financial responsibility.

History.

2013 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.